Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [604.51] ACTION FOR VIOLATION OF CIVIL RIGHTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Cause of action. new text end new text begin (a) Any person who, under color of any statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage of the United States or of any state or territory or the District of Columbia, subjects or causes to be subjected any citizen of this state or other person within the jurisdiction thereof to the deprivation of any rights, privileges, or immunities secured by the United States Constitution or the Minnesota Constitution shall be liable to the party injured in an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper proceedings for redress. new text end new text begin (b) In addition to any damages, injunction, or other appropriate relief in any action or proceedings under this section, the court shall award a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney fees and costs. new text end new text begin (c) An action under this section may not be commenced later than six years after the cause of action accrues. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Intergovernmental collaboration agreements. new text end new text begin A state or local law enforcement agency may not enter into any voluntary collaboration, task force, or partnership with a federal government agency unless the federal agency agrees in writing that, while operating under the collaboration, task force, or partnership: (1) the federal agency will abide by the United States Constitution and the Minnesota Constitution; and (2) the federal agency's officers, employees, or agents may be held liable under subdivision 1 for any violation of the United States Constitution or the Minnesota Constitution. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to all civil actions and proceedings pending on, or filed on or after, that date. new text end